North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 8. Commissioner of Banks and State Banking Commission. [Repealed]

§ 53-92.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective April 1, 2013.

History.

1931, c. 243, s. 1; 1935, c. 266; 1939, c. 91, s. 1; 1949, c. 372; 1953, c. 1209, ss. 4, 6; 1961, c. 547, s. 2; 1967, c. 789, s. 16; 1969, c. 844, s. 6; c. 920; 1979, c. 478, s. 1; 1981, c. 884, s. 1; 1983, c. 328, ss. 1, 3; 1985, c. 318; 1989, c. 781, s. 41.1; 1995, c. 490, s. 9; 2001-193, s. 14; 2003-63, s. 2; 2006-203, s. 16; 2009-57, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56,s. 1, effective April 1, 2013.

Cross References.

As to present provisions pertaining to the State Banking Commission, see

G.S. 53C-2-1

.

§§ 53-92.1 through 53-96.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-92.1; 1963, c. 793, s. 4; 1995, c. 129, s. 19; c. 267, ss. 1, 1.1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-93; 1931, c. 243, s. 2; 2003-63, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-93.1; 1959, c. 273; 1983, c. 717, s. 8; 1983 (Reg. Sess., 1984), c. 1034, s. 164; 1989, c. 752, s. 39(c); 1995, c. 129, s. 20; 2001-193, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-94; 1931, c. 243, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-95; 1931, c. 243, s. 4; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-96; 1931, c. 243, s. 6; 1957, c. 541, s. 3; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1137, s. 53; 1983, c. 717, s. 9; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 1039, s. 22; 1993, c. 321, s. 206(b); c. 561, s. 83; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-96.1; 2005-284, s. 1; 2007-484, s. 9(a); repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-97.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1983, c. 328, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to the filling of vacancies in the office of the Commissioner of Banks, see now

G.S. 53-92

.

§§ 53-98 through 53-102.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-98; 1931, c. 243, s. 9; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-99; 1931, c. 243, s. 10; 1977, 2nd Sess., c. 1181, s. 2; 1979, c. 255, s. 1; 1989, c. 9, s. 1; 1989 (Reg. Sess., 1990), c. 881, s. 3; 1995, c. 129, s. 21; 2001-393, s. 3; 2001-443, s. 3; 2004-171, s. 3; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-99.1; 1995, c. 408, s. 1; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-100; 1931, c. 243, s. 11; 1973, c. 47, s. 2; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1037, s. 90; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-101; 1931, c. 243, s. 12; 2005-284, s. 2; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-102; 1931, c. 243, s. 13; 2011-288, s. 6; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

§ 53-103.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1945, c. 743, s. 1.

§§ 53-104 through 53-116.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.

History.

S. 53-104; 1921, c. 4, s. 63; C.S., s. 222(a); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; 1945, c. 743, s. 1; 1979, c. 483, s. 10; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-104.1; 1979, c. 483, s. 11; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-105; 1921, c. 4, s. 64; 1923, c. 148, s. 2; C.S., s. 222(b); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1979, c. 483, s. 12; 1989, c. 187, s. 15; 1995, c. 129, s. 22; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-106; 1921, c. 4, s. 66; C.S., s. 222(d); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1981, c. 671, s. 12; 1995, c. 129, s. 23; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-107; 1921, c. 4, s. 67; C.S., s. 222(e); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1979, c. 483, s. 13; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-107.1; 1991, c. 677, s. 6; 1998-215, s. 29; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-107.2; 1991, c. 677, s. 6; 1998-215, s. 30; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-108; 1921, c. 4, s. 68; C.S., s. 222(f); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1979, c. 483, s. 14; 1989, c. 187, s. 16; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-109; 1921, c. 4, s. 69; C.S., s. 222(g); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-110; 1921, c. 4, s. 70; C.S., s. 222(h); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; 1951, c. 166, ss. 1, 2; 1991, c. 677, s. 7; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-111; 1921, c. 4, s. 71; C.S., s. 222(i); 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-112; 1927, c. 47, s. 13; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-113; 1927, c. 47, s. 14; 1931, c. 243, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-114; 1933, c. 120, s. 3; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; 1995, c. 129, s. 24; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-115; 1933, c. 120, s. 4; 1939, c. 91, s. 2; 1979, c. 483, s. 15; 2004-171, s. 4; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012. s. 53-116; 1933, c. 120, s. 5; repealed by 2012-56, s. 1, effective October 1, 2012.